Maryland, session 2025, SB0824.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
4–205.
(a) This section does not apply to:
(1) an establishment that already holds a Class A, Class B, or Class D beer
license, beer and wine license, or beer, wine, and liquor license; or
(2) a license holder that sells alcoholic beverages at discount prices.
(b) A local licensing board may not issue a [Class A,] Class B[,] or Class D beer
license, beer and wine license, or beer, wine, and liquor license for use in conjunction with
or on the premises of:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0824*

SENATE BILL 824
(1) a chain store;
(2) a supermarket; or
(3) a discount house.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.